District of Columbia statutes.
25-1008

Repealed

Prima facie evidence of intoxication.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-248, § 6, 44 DCR 1242
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(h), 48 DCR 7612
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-195, § 3(b), 53 DCR 8675
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 302, 59 DCR 12957
1981 Ed., § 25-1008.
D.C. Law 14-42, in subsec. (a)(2), inserted a comma after “test”.
D.C. Law 16-195, in the introductory language, substituted “and in the course of the trial there is received, based upon a chemical test, evidence of alcohol in the defendant’s blood, urine, or breath, such evidence:” for “the following standards shall apply to competent evidence based upon a chemical test:”; and rewrote pars. (1) and (2).
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 25-1004.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 25-1004.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(h) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3,
For temporary repeal of section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
For present law, see § 50-1908 et seq.